North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1. Apportionment of Members; Compensation and Allowances.
District 95: Iredell County: VTD BA: Block(s) 0970613023040, 0970613023041, 0970613023042, 0970613023043, 0970613023044, 0970613031018, 0970613031019, 0970613031020, 0970613031021, 0970613031022, 0970613031035, 0970613031036, 0970613031037, 0970613031038, 0970613031039, 0970613031040, 0970613031041, 0970613031043, 0970613031057, 0970613032000, 0970613032001, 0970613032002, 0970613032003, 0970613032004, 0970613032005, 0970613032006, 0970613032007, 0970613032008, 0970613032009, 0970613032010, 0970613032011, 0970613032012, 0970613032013, 0970613032014, 0970613032015, 0970613032016, 0970613032017, 0970613032018, 0970613032019, 0970613032020, 0970613032021, 0970613032022, 0970613032023, 0970613032024, 0970613032025, 0970613032027, 0970613032028, 0970613032048, 0970613032049, 0970613032066; VTD CC1, VTD CC2, VTD CC3, VTD CC4, VTD DV1-A, VTD DV1-B, VTD DV2-A, VTD DV2-B.

District 96: Catawba County: VTD 004, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 019, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 033, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 037, VTD 038, VTD 039.

District 97: Lincoln County.

District 98: Mecklenburg County: VTD 127, VTD 133: Block(s) 1190062093053, 1190062093054, 1190062093055, 1190062093056, 1190062093057, 1190062111000, 1190062111001, 1190062111014, 1190062121000, 1190062121003, 1190063081001, 1190063081007, 1190063081009, 1190063081010, 1190063081011, 1190063081012, 1190063081013, 1190063081014, 1190063081015, 1190063081016, 1190063081017, 1190063081018, 1190063081029, 1190063081033, 1190063081076, 1190063081077, 1190063081078, 1190063081079, 1190063081081, 1190063081082, 1190063111005, 1190063111006, 1190063111007, 1190063111008, 1190063111009, 1190063111010, 1190063111011, 1190064071014, 1190064071023, 1190064071025, 1190064071026, 1190064071027, 1190064071028, 1190064071029, 1190064071030, 1190064071046, 1190064071047, 1190064071048, 1190064071049, 1190064071050, 1190064072000, 1190064072001, 1190064072002, 1190064072003, 1190064072006, 1190064072008, 1190064072009, 1190064072010, 1190064072011, 1190064072012, 1190064072013, 1190064072014, 1190064072015, 1190064072016, 1190064072017, 1190064072018, 1190064072019, 1190064072020, 1190064072021; VTD 134, VTD 142, VTD 143, VTD 202, VTD 206, VTD 208, VTD 240, VTD 242.

District 99: Mecklenburg County: VTD 003, VTD 042, VTD 060, VTD 082, VTD 104, VTD 105, VTD 132, VTD 141, VTD 149, VTD 204.1, VTD 205, VTD 237.

District 100: Mecklenburg County: VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 017, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 045, VTD 062, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 066, VTD 084, VTD 099, VTD 102, VTD 106, VTD 108, VTD 117, VTD 124, VTD 125, VTD 130.

District 101: Mecklenburg County: VTD 012, VTD 024, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 053, VTD 079, VTD 080, VTD 081, VTD 089, VTD 150, VTD 222, VTD 223.1, VTD 224.

District 102: Mecklenburg County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 005, VTD 011, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 043, VTD 044, VTD 046, VTD 054, VTD 055, VTD 056, VTD 061, VTD 109.

District 103: Mecklenburg County: VTD 085, VTD 090, VTD 091, VTD 096, VTD 103, VTD 112, VTD 113, VTD 118, VTD 121, VTD 136, VTD 137, VTD 215, VTD 216, VTD 217, VTD 218, VTD 227, VTD 233.

District 104: Mecklenburg County: VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 032, VTD 036, VTD 047, VTD 048, VTD 057, VTD 058, VTD 065, VTD 067, VTD 068, VTD 069, VTD 070, VTD 071, VTD 072, VTD 073, VTD 074, VTD 075, VTD 076, VTD 086, VTD 100, VTD 110, VTD 111, VTD 119, VTD 120, VTD 131.

District 105: Mecklenburg County: VTD 087, VTD 088, VTD 092, VTD 093, VTD 097, VTD 101, VTD 114, VTD 129, VTD 139.1, VTD 140, VTD 144, VTD 148, VTD 226, VTD 231, VTD 232.

District 106: Mecklenburg County: VTD 126, VTD 128, VTD 133: Block(s) 1190063081000, 1190063081002, 1190063081003, 1190063081004, 1190063081005, 1190063081006, 1190063081008, 1190063081019, 1190063081020, 1190063081021, 1190063081022, 1190063081023, 1190063081024, 1190063081025, 1190063081026, 1190063081027, 1190063081028, 1190063081030, 1190063081031, 1190063081032, 1190063081034, 1190063081035, 1190063081036, 1190063081037, 1190063081038, 1190063081039, 1190063081040, 1190063081041, 1190063081042, 1190063081043, 1190063081044, 1190063081045, 1190063081046, 1190063081047, 1190063081048, 1190063081049, 1190063081050, 1190063081051, 1190063081052, 1190063081053, 1190063081054, 1190063081055, 1190063081056, 1190063081057, 1190063081058, 1190063081059, 1190063081060, 1190063081061, 1190063081062, 1190063081063, 1190063081064, 1190063081065, 1190063081066, 1190063081067, 1190063081068, 1190063081069, 1190063081070, 1190063081071, 1190063081072, 1190063081073, 1190063081074, 1190063081075, 1190063081080; VTD 145, VTD 151, VTD 207, VTD 212, VTD 214, VTD 239, VTD 241.

District 107: Mecklenburg County: VTD 016, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 107.1, VTD 135, VTD 146, VTD 209, VTD 210, VTD 211, VTD 213, VTD 238.1.

District 108: Gaston County: VTD 008, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 030, VTD 032, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 043, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 046.

District 109: Gaston County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 023, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 031.

District 110: Cleveland County: VTD CASAR, VTD FALSTN, VTD KINGST, VTD LATT, VTD LAWNDL, VTD MULLS, VTD POLKVL, VTD S 5, VTD S-4A, VTD WACO; Gaston County: VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 037, VTD 038.

District 111: Cleveland County: VTD 0S-C, VTD 0S-S, VTD BETHWR, VTD BR, VTD GROVER, VTD KM N, VTD KM S, VTD MRB-YO, VTD OAKGRV, VTD RIPPY, VTD SHANGI; Rutherford County: VTD 011, VTD 019, VTD 03A, VTD 05A, VTD 09A, VTD 10A.

District 112: Mecklenburg County: VTD 004, VTD 083, VTD 094, VTD 095, VTD 115, VTD 116, VTD 123, VTD 201, VTD 203, VTD 219, VTD 220, VTD 221, VTD 234, VTD 235, VTD 236.

District 113: Henderson County: VTD AR, VTD EF, VTD FR, VTD NB, VTD RR, VTD SB, VTD SE; McDowell County: VTD DYSART, VTD GLENWD; Polk County, Rutherford County: VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 018, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030, VTD 034, VTD 04A, VTD 06A, VTD 16A.

District 114: Buncombe County: VTD 1.1, VTD 10.1, VTD 11.1, VTD 17.1, VTD 2.1, VTD 20.1, VTD 21.1, VTD 23.2, VTD 23.3, VTD 25.1, VTD 3.1, VTD 32.1, VTD 33.2, VTD 33.3, VTD 34.1, VTD 35.1, VTD 36.1, VTD 37.1, VTD 38.2, VTD 38.3, VTD 39.2, VTD 39.3, VTD 50.1, VTD 6.1, VTD 60.2, VTD 60.4, VTD 61.1, VTD 62.1, VTD 64.1, VTD 65.1, VTD 66.1, VTD 7.1, VTD 8.3, VTD 9.1.

District 115: Buncombe County: VTD 13.1, VTD 18.2, VTD 19.1, VTD 24.1, VTD 26.1, VTD 29.2, VTD 30.2, VTD 30.3, VTD 31.1, VTD 44.1, VTD 45.1, VTD 46.1, VTD 47.1, VTD 48.1, VTD 49.1, VTD 54.2, VTD 55.1, VTD 56.2, VTD 57.1, VTD 8.2.

District 116: Buncombe County: VTD 12.1, VTD 14.2, VTD 14.3, VTD 15.1, VTD 16.2, VTD 22.2, VTD 27.2, VTD 28.1, VTD 4.1, VTD 40.2, VTD 41.1, VTD 42.1, VTD 43.2, VTD 5.1, VTD 51.2, VTD 52.1, VTD 53.1, VTD 58.1, VTD 59.1, VTD 63.1, VTD 67.1, VTD 68.1, VTD 69.1, VTD 70.1, VTD 71.1.

District 117: Henderson County: VTD AT, VTD BC, VTD BK, VTD CB, VTD CC, VTD ED, VTD ES, VTD EV, VTD FL, VTD GM, VTD GR, VTD HC, VTD HS, VTD HV-1, VTD HV-2, VTD HV-3, VTD LJ, VTD LP, VTD MG, VTD NE, VTD NM, VTD NW, VTD PR, VTD PV, VTD RG, VTD SM, VTD SW.

District 118: Haywood County, Madison County.

District 119: Jackson County, Swain County, Transylvania County.

District 120: Cherokee County, Clay County, Graham County, Macon County.

The names and boundaries of voting tabulation districts, tracts, block groups, and blocks specified in this section are as shown on the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

If any voting tabulation district boundary is changed, that change shall not change the boundary of a House district, which shall remain the same as it is depicted by the 2010 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line Shapefiles.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-416, s. 2, effective November 7, 2011, and applicable to elections held on or after January 1, 2012.

The Legislative Services Officer shall certify a true copy of the block assignment file associated with any mapping software used to generate the language in subsection (a) of this section. The certified true copy of the block assignment file shall be delivered by the Legislative Services Officer to the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives. If any area within North Carolina is not assigned to a specific district by subsection (a) of this section, the certified true copy of the block assignment file delivered to the Principal Clerk of the House of Representatives shall control.

History.

Code, s. 2845; Rev., c. 4399; 1911, c. 151; C.S., s. 6088; 1921, c. 144; 1941, c. 112; 1961, c. 265; 1966, Ex. Sess., c. 5, s. 1; 1971, c. 483; 1981, c. 800; c. 1130, s. 1; 1982, Ex. Sess., c. 4; 1982, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1984, Ex. Sess., c. 1, ss. 1, 2; c. 6, ss. 1-6; c. 7; 1991, c. 675, s. 1; 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 5, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 553, s. 34; 2001-459, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 77; 2002-1, Ex Sess., ss. 1, 2; 2002-2, Ex. Sess., s. 1; 2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., ss. 1, 2; 2009-78, s. 1; 2011-404, s. 1; 2011-416, s. 2; 2017-208, s. 1; 2019-46, s. 1; 2019-220, s. 1; 2021-175, s. 1; 2022-4, s. 1.

District Plans for 2002 Elections.

Session Laws 2002-1 enacted a House Redistricting Plan (“Proposed House Plan - Sutton 5”) and a Senate Redistricting Plan (“Proposed Senate Plan - Fewer Divided Counties”), which were created to correct constitutional deficiencies found by the
North Carolina Supreme Court in Stephenson v. Bartlett,

355 N.C. 354

, 562 S.E.2d 377 (2002), in Sutton House Plan 3 (enacted by Session Laws 2001-458) and in NC Senate Plan 1C (enacted by Session Laws 2001-459). The House and Senate Redistricting Plans were ratified on May 17, 2002, and became Session Laws 2002-1 on May 20, 2002.

Both plans were subsequently held constitutionally invalid by the North Carolina Superior Court in Stephenson v. Bartlett, No. 01 CVS 2885 (N.C. Sup. Ct. May 31, 2002). In their place, the North Carolina Superior Court, on May 31, 2002, presented “Interim House Redistricting Plan for NC 2002 Elections” and “Interim Senate Redistricting Plan for NC 2002 Elections,” and ordered that, upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, the plans be immediately implemented so that the election process could proceed forthwith. Preclearance was received from the United States Department of Justice by letter dated July 12, 2002.